en: no glucose-fructose syrup
bg: без глюкозно-фруктозен сироп
ca: sense sirop de glucosa-fructosa
de: ohne Glukose-Fruktose-Sirup
es: sin jarabe de glucosa-fructosa
fi: ei glukoosi-fruktoosisiirappia
fr: sans sirop de glucose-fructose
he: ללא סירופ גלוקוז-פרוקטוזה
hr: bez sirupa od glukoze-fruktoze
hu: glükóz-fruktóz szirup nélkül
it: senza sciroppo di glucosio-fruttosio
nl: geen glucose-fructose siroop
pl: bez syropu glukozowo-fruktozowego
pt: sem xarope de glucose-frutose

en: No additives, without additives
bg: Без добавки
ca: Sense additius
cs: Bez přidaných látek
da: Uden tilsætningsstoffer
de: Ohne Zusätze
el: Χωρίς πρόσθετα
es: Sin aditivos
et: Ilma lisanditeta
fi: lisäaineeton, ei lisäaineita, ilman lisäaineita
fr: Sans additifs, Sans additif, aucun additif
he: ללא תוספים
hr: bez aditiva
hu: Adalékanyagmentes, Hozzáadott adalékanyag nélkül, hozzáadott adalékanyagot nem tartalmaz, nincs hozzáadott adalékanyag, hozzáadott adalékok nélkül, hozzáadott adalékanyagok nélkül, adalékok nélkül, adalék nélkül, adalékanyag mentes, adalékmentes
id: Tanpa bahan tambahan
it: Nessun additivo
ja: 添加物なし
ko: 첨가물 없음
lt: Be priedų
lv: Bez piedevām
ms: Tanpa bahan tambahan
nl: Zonder toevoegingen
pl: Bez dodatków, Brak dodatków
pt: Sem aditivos, sem aditivo
ro: Fără aditivi
ru: Без добавок
sk: Bez prídavných látok
sl: Brez aditivov
sq: Pa aditivë
sr: Bez aditiva
sv: Utan tillsatser
th: ไม่มีสารเติมแต่ง
tr: Katkı Maddesi yok
uk: Без добавок
vi: Không có chất phụ gia
zh: 无添加剂

en: With additives
bg: С добавки
ca: Amb additius
de: Mit Zusätzen
es: Con aditivos
fi: Lisäaineilla
fr: Avec additifs
it: Con additivi
nl: Met toevoegingen
pl: Z dodatkami
pt: Com aditivos
ru: С добавками

en: No artificial additives
bg: Без изкуствени добавки
ca: Sense additius artificials
de: Ohne künstliche Zusätze
es: Sin aditivos artificiales
fi: ei keinotekoisia lisäaineita, ilman keinotekoisia lisäaineita
fr: Sans additifs artificiels
he: ללא תוספים מלאכותיים
hu: Mesterséges adalékanyagok nélkül, Hozzáadott mesterséges adalékanyag nélkül, hozzáadott mesterséges adalékanyagot nem tartalmaz, hozzáadott mesterséges adalékok nélkül, hozzáadott mesterséges adalékanyagok nélkül, mesterséges adalékok nélkül, mesterséges adalék nélkül, mesterséges adalékanyag mentes, mesterséges adalékmentes, mesterséges adalékanyagmentes
it: Senza additivi artificiali
nl: Zonder kunstmatige toevoegingen
pt: Sem aditivos artificiais, sem aditivo artificial
sv: Inga konstgjorda tillsatser

en: No anticaking agent
de: Ohne Trennmittel

en: High in calories
es: Alto en calorías

sv: Ä-märket
xx: Ä-märket

en: No alcohol, alcohol-free, without alcohol
bg: Без алкохол
ca: Sense alcohol, Lliure d'alcohol
da: Uden alkohol
de: Ohne Alkohol
es: Sin alcohol
fi: alkoholiton, ilman alkoholia
fr: Sans alcool
he: ללא אלכוהול, נטול אלכוהול
hu: Alkoholmentes
it: Senza alcol
nl: Alcoholvrij, Zonder alchohol
pl: Bez alkoholu
pt: Sem álcool, 0% álcool
sv: Utan alkohol
th: ไม่มีแอลกอฮอล์

en: Contains alcohol
bg: Съдържа алкохол
da: Indeholder alkohol
de: Enthält Alkohol
es: Contiene alcohol
fr: Contient de l'alcool
hu: Alkoholt tartalmaz
it: Contiene alcol
nl: Bevat alcohol
pl: Zawiera alkohol
pt: Contém álcool
ru: Содержит алкоголь

en: Don't consume with alcohol
sv: Använd ej tilsammans med alkohol

en: without allergens
bg: без алергени
ca: sense al·lèrgens
de: ohne Allergene
es: sin alérgenos
fi: ilman allergeeneja
fr: sans allergènes
hr: bez alergena
hu: allergénmentes
it: senza allergeni
nl: zonder allergenen
pl: bez alergenów
pt: sem alérgenos
ru: без аллергенов
th: ไม่มีสารก่อภูมิแพ้

en: No artificial colors, free of artificial color, no artificial colours, free from artificial colours, no artificial colouring, contains no artificial colors
bg: Без изкуствени оцветители
ca: Sense colorants artificials
de: Ohne künstliche Farbstoffe
es: Sin colorantes artificiales
fi: ei keinotekoisia väriaineita, ilman keinotekoisia väriaineita
fr: Sans colorants artificiels
he: ללא צבעי מאכל מלאכותיים
hr: bez umjetnih bojila, bez umjetnih boja
hu: Mesterséges színezék nélkül, Mesterséges színezéket nem tartalmaz, mesterséges színezék mentes
it: Senza coloranti artificiali
nl: Zonder kunstmatige kleurstoffen, Vrij van kunstmatige kleurstoffen
pl: Bez sztucznych barwników
pt: Sem cores artificiais, sem cor artificial, sem corantes artificiais, sem corante artificial
ru: без искусственных красителей
sv: Inga artificiella färgämnen
th: ไม่เติมสีสังเคราะห์

en: without azo dyes, without azodyes
fi: atsoväritön, ei atsovärejä, ilman atsovärejä
fr: Sans colorants azoïques

en: No artificial flavors, free of artificial flavor, No artificial flavours, contains no artificial flavors
bg: Без изкуствени аромати
ca: Sense aromes artificials, Lliure d'aromes artificials
cs: Bez umělých aromat
da: Ingen kunstige aromaer
de: Ohne künstliche Aromen
el: Χωρίς τεχνητές αρωματικές ουσίες
es: Sin aromas artificiales
et: Ilma kunstlike lõhna- ja maitseaineteta
fi: ei keinotekoisia aromeja, ilman keinotekoisia aromeja
fr: Sans arômes artificiels, sans arôme artificiel, sans aromatisants artificiels
he: ללא חומרי טעם מלאכותיים
hr: Bez umjetnih aroma
hu: Mesterséges ízesítők nélkül, Mesterséges aromák nélkül, Mesterséges ízesítőt nem tartalmaz, Mesterséges aromát nem tartalmaz, Mesterséges ízesítő nélkül, Mesterséges aroma nélkül
id: Tanpa perisa buatan
it: Senza aromi artificiali
ja: 人工香料不使用
ko: 인공 향료 무첨가
lt: Be dirbtinių kvapiųjų medžiagų
lv: Bez mākslīgām garšvielām
ms: Tanpa perisa tiruan
nl: Vrij van kunstmatige smaakstoffen, Zonder kunstmatige smaakstoffen
no: Uten kunstige smaksstoffer
pl: Bez sztucznych aromatów
pt: Sem sabores artificiais, livre de sabor artificial, livre de sabores artificiais, sem aromas artificiais
ro: Fără arome artificiale
ru: без искусственных ароматизаторов, без добавления искусственных ароматизаторов
sk: Bez umelých aróm
sl: Brez umetnih arom
sq: Pa aroma artificiale
sv: Inga artificiella aromämnen
th: ไม่เติมกลิ่นสังเคราะห์
tr: Yapay aroma içermez
uk: Без штучних ароматизаторів
zh: 无人工香料

fr: Sans arômes ni colorants artificiels
bg: Без изкуствени аромати и оцветители
ca: Sense aromes ni colorants artificials
de: Ohne künstliche Aromen und Farbstoffe
es: Sin aromas ni colorantes artificiales
fi: ei keinotekoisia aromeja eikä väriaineita
he: ללא חומרי טעם וצבע מלאכותיים
hu: Mesterséges ízesítők és színezékek nélkül
it: Senza aromi né coloranti artificiali
nl: Zonder kunstmatige smaakstoffen en kleurstoffen
pl: Bez sztucznych aromatów i barwników
pt: Sem aromas nem corantes artificiais

en: No artificial sweeteners
bg: Без изкуствени подсладители
ca: Sense edulcorants artificials
de: Ohne künsztliche Süßungsmittel
es: Sin edulcorantes artificiales, Sin endulzantes artificiales
fi: ei keinotekoisia makeutusaineita, ilman keinotekoisia makeutusaineita
fr: Sans édulcorant artificiel
he: ללא ממתיקים מלאכותיים
hu: Mesterséges édesítők nélkül, Mesterséges édesítőszerek nélkül, mesterséges édesítőszert nem tartalmaz
it: Senza dolcificanti artificiali
nl: Zonder kunstmatige suikers, Zonder suikervervangers
pl: Bez sztucznych słodzików
pt: Sem adoçantes artificiais
sv: Utan artificiella sötningsmedel

en: No artificial flavourings or sweeteners
pt: Sem aromatizantes ou adoçantes

en: No sweeteners added
sv: Utan tillsatt sötningsmedel, Osötad, Osötat

en: No artificial preservatives, free of artificial preservative
bg: Без изкуствени консерванти
ca: Sense conservants artificials
de: Ohne künstliche Konservierungsstoffe
es: Sin conservantes artificiales, Sin conservadores artificiales
fi: ei keinotekoisia säilöntäaineita, ilman keinotekoisia säilöntäaineita
fr: Sans conservateur artificiel
hu: Mesterséges tartósítószer nélkül, Mesterséges tartósítószert nem tartalmaz
it: Senza conservanti artificiali
nl: Zonder kunstmatige bewaarstoffen
pl: Bez sztucznych konserwantów
pt: Sem conservantes artificiais, livre de conservantes artificiais

en: No artificial colours and preservatives
bg: Без изкуствени оцветители и консерванти
ca: Sense colorants i conservants artificials
de: Keine künstlichen Farbstoffe und Konservierungsstoffe
es: Sin colorantes y conservantes artificiales
fi: ei keinotekoisia väriaineita eikä säilöntäaineita
fr: Sans colorants et conservateurs artificiels
he: ללא צבעים וחומרים משמרים מלאכותיים
hr: bez umjetnih bojila i konzervansa
hu: Mesterséges színezék és tartósítószer nélkül
it: Senza coloranti e conservanti artificiali
nl: Zonder kunstmatige kleurstoffen en conserveermiddelen
pl: Bez sztucznych barwników i konserwantów
pt: Sem corantes e conservantes artificiais
sv: Inga artificiella färgämnen och konserveringsmedel
th: ไม่ใช้สีและสารกันเสียเทียม